Utah statutes.
76-10-1105.   Possessing a gambling device or record.
(1) A person is guilty of possessing a gambling device or record if he
knowingly possesses it with intent to use it in gambling.
(2)  Possession of a gambling device or record is a class B misdemeanor,
provided, however, that any person who is twice convicted under this section
shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor, and any person who is convicted
three or more times under this section shall be guilty of a felony of the
third degree.
